Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6240.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-31.1-22 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-31.1 entitled "Dentists
and Dental Hygienists" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-31.1-22. Limited registrations Limited registrations of dentists.
(a)(1) An applicant for limited registration under this chapter who furnishes the board with
satisfactory proof that the applicant is eighteen (18) years of age or older and of good moral
character, that the applicant has graduated from a dental school accredited by the American Dental
Association Commission on Dental Accreditation or its designated agency and approved by the
board, and or that they have been employed as a member of the faculty of a school of dentistry
accredited by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation, or its
designated agency or that the applicant has been appointed an intern, resident, fellow, or dental
officer in a hospital or other institution maintained by the state, or by a city or town, or in a hospital
or clinic that is incorporated under the laws of this state or in a clinic that is affiliated with a hospital
licensed by the department of health, or in an outpatient clinic operated by the state, may, upon the
payment as set forth in § 23-1-54, be registered by the board as a hospital dental officer for any
time that the board prescribes; but that limited registration entitles the applicant to practice dentistry
in the hospital or other institution designated on his or her certificate of limited registration, or
outside that hospital or other institution for the treatment, under the supervision of one of its dental
officers who is a licensed dentist, in the state of persons accepted by it as patients, or in any hospital,

institution, clinic, or program affiliated for training purposes with the hospital, institution, or clinic
designated on this certificate, which affiliation is approved by the board, and in any case under
regulations established by that hospital, institution, or clinic. Each hospital, institution, or clinic
shall annually submit to the board a list of training programs that comply with the terms of this
section.
(2) Practice under any such original or renewal limited registration so issued by the board
shall be limited to no longer than five (5) years unless said applicant passes a clinical examination
administered by the board or is a full-time faculty member.
(3) Any applicant who has practiced under an original or renewed license for five (5) years
and who has passed a clinical examination administered by the board may qualify for a renewal of
such license for a period not to exceed five (5) years in which the applicant may continue to practice
in a hospital or other institution designated on their registration and under the direction of a
registered dentist employed therein.
(b)(1) A limited registration shall entitle an applicant to practice dentistry only in the
hospital or other institution designated on their registration and under the direction of a registered
dentist or a special registration dentist employed therein. Limited registration under this section
may be revoked at any time by the board and a holder of such a limited registration shall not practice
dentistry in a private dental office or private dental clinic.
(2) A full-time faculty member may participate in, and only in, an intramural group dental
practice which is operated, managed and physically located within a nonprofit dental educational
or research institution and their affiliated hospitals in which the full-time faculty member is
employed.
(c)(1) Upon the completion of ten (10) years of practice under any original or renewal
license authorized by subsection (a) of this section, an applicant may apply for a special registration.
A special registration shall entitle an applicant to practice dentistry in the hospital or other
institution designated on their registration and in any private dental practice where RIte Care is
accepted without the supervision of a registered dentist.
(2) The applicant shall practice dentistry in equal amounts in:
(i) The hospital or other institution designated on their registration; and
(ii) Any private dental practice where RIte Care is accepted.
(d) A dentist who has obtained not less than five (5) years of lawful practice in a foreign
country or province who presents to the board a certificate of registration and duration of practice
from the foreign country or province’s board of registration of dentistry or equivalent entity may
apply for a limited registration; provided, however, that such other jurisdictions shall require a
LC002584 - Page 2 of 4

degree of competency determined by the board to be comparable to that required of examinees in
this state.
(e) The board and/or the director may promulgate any rules and regulations that may be
necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
Limited registration under this section may be revoked at any time by the board. The board
and/or the director may promulgate any rules and regulations that it deems necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 5-33.1 of the General Laws entitled "Funeral Service Contracts" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-33.1-22.1. Limited registration of dental hygienists.
The board may examine a person of good moral character who is not less than nineteen
(19) years of age, upon the payment of the fee set forth in § 23-1-54, to the department of health,
in subjects considered essential for a dental hygienist and, if the results of the person’s examination
are satisfactory, the person shall receive a limited registration as a dental hygienist and be given a
certificate allowing them to practice dental hygiene if they are:
(1) A graduate of a school for dental hygienists that:
(i) Is accredited or recognized as accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation
of the American Dental Association; and
(ii) Requires a course of not less than one academic year that is approved by the board;
(2) A full-time dental student who has satisfactorily completed not less than four (4) full
semesters in an accredited dental college; or
(3) A graduate from an accredited dental college who has not previously been examined
by the board in subjects considered by the board to be essential for a dental hygienist.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002584
========
LC002584 - Page 3 of 4